Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-817
Bond; cost, appeal, supersedeas, injunction, attachment; when not required.

No bond for cost, appeal, supersedeas, injunction, or attachment shall be required of any city of the metropolitan class or of any officer, board, commission, head of any department, agent, or employee of any such city in any proceeding or court action in which such city of the metropolitan class or its officer, board, commission, head of department, agent, or employee is a party litigant in such person's or entity's official capacity.

Laws 1961, c. 31, § 1, p. 151;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 237.
July 21, 2022
An appeal by a party described in this section operates as a supersedeas of a lower court judgment. Cummings Enterprises v. Shukert, 231 Neb. 370, 436 N.W.2d 199 (1989).